Virginia statutes. Title 51.01. Persons With Disabilities.
§§ 51.01-1 through 51.01-46.

Recodified as Title 51.5.

Editor’s note.

Title 51.01 has been recodified as Title 51.5 by the Virginia Code Commission for better arrangement in the Code. The order of sections within the title is not affected by the recodification. References in sections of Title 51.5 to other sections within the title have been changed to reflect the recodification.